Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.070

Spoofing.

(1) A person is guilty of spoofing if he or she, without authorization, knowingly initiates the transmission, display, or receipt of the identifying information of another organization or person for the purpose of gaining unauthorized access to electronic data, a data system, or a data network, and with the intent to commit another crime in violation of a state law not included in this chapter.

(2) Spoofing is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2016 c 164 s 7.]